Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3521
Custodial trust; aggregate value; limitation.

Transfers or declarations of property to a custodial trust under the Nebraska Uniform Custodial Trust Act shall not exceed, in the aggregate, one hundred thousand dollars in net value, exclusive of the value of the transferor's or declarant's personal residence. This limitation does not apply to any income received by the custodial trust and any appreciation in the value of the property held in the custodial trust. A good faith violation of this section does not invalidate the custodial trust.

Laws 1997, LB 51, § 21.